Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,122
Report.

On or before February 15 of each year, the executive director of an opportunity zone commission shall transmit to the Governor and the Clerk of the Legislature an annual report which includes a summary of the commission's activities, recommendations for future economic development action in the opportunity zone, and an accounting of the source and use of funds disbursed during the previous fiscal year.

Laws 2005, LB 546, § 6.
December 31, 2010